Oklahoma, session 2025, SB673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1738, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 133, O.S.L. 2023 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1738), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1738. A. 1. Any commissioned peace officer of this


state is authorized to seize any equipment, vehicle, airplane,


vessel or any other conveyance that is used in the commission of any


armed robbery offense defined in Section 801 of this title, used to


facilitate the intentional discharge of any kind of firearm in


violation of Section 652 of this title, used in violation of the


Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, used in the attempt or commission

Req. No. 1397 Page 1


of any act of burglary in the first or second degree, motor vehicle


theft, unauthorized use of a vehicle, obliteration of distinguishing


numbers on vehicles or criminal possession of vehicles with altered,


removed or obliterated numbers as defined by Sections 1431, 1435,


1716, 1719 and 1720 of this title or Sections 4-104 and 4-107 of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, used in the commission of any


arson offense defined in Section 1401, 1402, 1403, 1404 or 1405 of


this title, used in any manner to facilitate or participate in the


commission of any human trafficking offense in violation of Section


748 of this title, or used by any defendant when such vehicle or


other conveyance is used in any manner by a prostitute, pimp or


panderer to facilitate or participate in the commission of any


prostitution offense in violation of Sections 1028, 1029 or 1030 of


this title; provided, however, that the vehicle or conveyance of a


customer or anyone merely procuring the services of a prostitute


shall not be included.


2. No conveyance used by a person as a common carrier in the


transaction of business as a common carrier shall be forfeited under


the provisions of this section unless it shall appear that the owner


or other person in charge of such conveyance was a consenting party


or privy to the unlawful use of the conveyance in violation of this


section.


3. No conveyance shall be forfeited under the provisions of


this section by reason of any act or omission established by the

Req. No. 1397 Page 2


owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without the


knowledge or consent of such owner, and if the act is committed by


any person other than such owner, the owner shall establish further


that the conveyance was unlawfully in the possession of a person


other than the owner in violation of the criminal laws of the United


States or of any state.


B. In addition to the property described in subsection A of


this section, the following property is also subject to forfeiture


pursuant to this section:


1. Property used in the commission of theft of livestock or in


any manner to facilitate the theft of livestock;


2. The proceeds gained from the commission of theft of


livestock;


3. Personal property acquired with proceeds gained from the


commission of theft of livestock;


4. All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels,


and horses or dogs which are used to transport or in any manner to


facilitate the transportation for the purpose of the commission of


theft of livestock;


5. Any items having a counterfeit mark and all property that is


owned by or registered to the defendant that is employed or used in


connection with any violation of the Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting


Act;



Req. No. 1397 Page 3


6. Any weapon possessed, used or available for use in any


manner during the commission of a felony within the State of


Oklahoma, or any firearm that is possessed by a convicted felon;


7. Any police scanner used in violation of Section 1214 of this


title;


8. Any computer and its components and peripherals, including


but not limited to the central processing unit, monitor, keyboard,


printers, scanners, software, and hardware, when it is used in the


commission of any crime in this state;


9. All property used in the commission of, or in any manner to


facilitate, a violation of Section 1040.12a of this title;


10. All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels,


monies, coins and currency, or other instrumentality used or


intended to be used, in any manner or part, to commit a violation of


paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 1021 of this title, where the


victim of the crime is a minor child, subsection B of Section 1021


of this title, Section 1021.2 of this title, paragraph 1 of


subsection A of Section 1111 of this title, or paragraphs 2 and 3 of


subsection A of Section 1123 of this title;


11. All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels,


monies, coins and currency, or other instrumentality used in any


manner or part, to commit any violation of the provisions set forth


in Section 748 of this title;



Req. No. 1397 Page 4


12. Any and all property used in any manner or part to


facilitate, participate or further the commission of a human


trafficking offense in violation of Section 748 of this title, and


all property, including monies, real estate, or any other tangible


assets or property of or derived from or used by a prostitute, pimp


or panderer in any manner or part to facilitate, participate or


further the commission of any prostitution offense in violation of


Sections 1028, 1029 or 1030 of this title; provided, however, any


monies, real estate or any other tangible asset or property of a


customer or anyone merely procuring the services of a prostitute


shall not be included;


13. Any vehicle, airplane, vessel, or parts of a vehicle whose


numbers have been removed, altered or obliterated so as to prevent


determination of the true identity or ownership of said property and


parts of vehicles which probable cause indicates are stolen but


whose true ownership cannot be determined;


14. Any and all equipment or instrumentality used in any manner


or part to commit any act of catalytic converter theft in violation


of subsection B of Section 1435 of this title and any monies, coins,


currency, or financial instruments used, derived from or traceable


as proceeds from a violation of subsection B of Section 1435 of this


title;


15. Any and all equipment or instrumentality used in any manner


or part to commit any act of copper theft in violation of Section

Req. No. 1397 Page 5


1727 of this title, and any monies, coins, currency, or financial


instruments used, derived from or traceable as proceeds from a


violation of Section 1727 of this title; and


16. Any and all equipment or instrumentality used in any manner


or part to commit any violation of the Oklahoma Scrap Metal Dealers


Act, and any monies, coins, currency, or financial instruments used


or traceable as proceeds from a violation of the Oklahoma Scrap


Metal Dealers Act.


C. Property described in subsection A or B of this section may


be held as evidence until a forfeiture has been declared or a


release ordered. Forfeiture Following the conviction of a person


for an offense to which forfeiture applies, forfeiture actions under


this section may be brought by the district attorney in the proper


county of venue as petitioner; provided, in the event the district


attorney elects not to file such action, or fails to file such


action within ninety (90) days of the date of the seizure of such


equipment conviction, the property shall be returned to the owner.


D. Notice of seizure and intended forfeiture proceeding shall


be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the


county wherein such property is seized and shall be given all owners


and parties in interest.


E. Notice shall be given according to one of the following


methods:



Req. No. 1397 Page 6


1. Upon each owner or party in interest whose right, title, or


interest is of record in the Oklahoma Tax Commission or with the


county clerk for filings under the Uniform Commercial Code, served


in the manner of service of process in civil cases prescribed by


Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. Upon each owner or party in interest whose name and address


is known, served in the manner of service of process in civil cases


prescribed by Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


3. Upon all other owners, whose addresses are unknown, but who


are believed to have an interest in the property by one publication


in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the


seizure was made.


F. Within sixty (60) days after the mailing or publication of


the notice, the owner of the property and any other party in


interest or claimant may file a verified answer and claim to the


property described in the notice of seizure and of the intended


forfeiture proceeding.


G. If at the end of sixty (60) days after the notice has been


mailed or published there is no verified answer on file, the court


shall hear evidence upon the fact of the unlawful use and may order


the property forfeited to the state, if such fact is proven.


H. If a verified answer is filed, the forfeiture proceeding


shall be set for hearing.



Req. No. 1397 Page 7


I. At the hearing the petitioner shall prove by clear and


convincing evidence that property was used in the attempt or


commission of an act specified in subsection A of this section or is


property described in subsection B of this section with knowledge by


the owner of the property.


J. The claimant of any right, title, or interest in the


property may prove the lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract


to be bona fide and that the right, title, or interest created by


the document was created without any knowledge or reason to believe


that the property was being, or was to be, used for the purpose


charged.


K. In the event of such proof, the court may order the property


released to the bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee,


or vendor if the amount due such person is equal to, or in excess


of, the value of the property as of the date of the seizure, it


being the intention of this section to forfeit only the right,


title, or interest of the purchaser, except for items bearing a


counterfeit mark or used exclusively to manufacture a counterfeit


mark.


L. If the amount due to such person is less than the value of


the property, or if no bona fide claim is established, the property


may be forfeited to the state and may be sold pursuant to judgment


of the court, as on sale upon execution, and as provided in Section


2-508 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except as otherwise

Req. No. 1397 Page 8


provided for by law and for property bearing a counterfeit mark


which shall be destroyed.


M. Property taken or detained pursuant to this section shall


not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the


petitioner or in the custody of the law enforcement agency as


provided in the Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act. Except for


property required to be destroyed pursuant to the Trademark Anti-


Counterfeiting Act, the petitioner shall release said property to


the owner of the property if it is determined that the owner had no


knowledge of the illegal use of the property or if there is


insufficient evidence to sustain the burden of showing illegal use


of such property. If the owner of the property stipulates to the


forfeiture and waives the hearing, the petitioner may determine if


the value of the property is equal to or less than the outstanding


lien. If such lien exceeds the value of the property, the property


may be released to the lien holder. Property which has not been


released by the petitioner shall be subject to the orders and


decrees of the court or the official having jurisdiction thereof.


N. The petitioner, or the law enforcement agency holding


property pursuant to the Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, shall


not be held civilly liable for having custody of the seized property


or proceeding with a forfeiture action as provided for in this


section.



Req. No. 1397 Page 9


O. Attorney fees shall not be assessed against the state or the


petitioner for any actions or proceeding pursuant to Section 1701 et


seq. of this title.


P. The proceeds of the sale of any property shall be


distributed as follows, in the order indicated:


1. To the bona fide or innocent purchaser, conditional sales


vendor, or mortgagee of the property, if any, up to the amount of


such person’s interest in the property, when the court declaring the


forfeiture orders a distribution to such person;


2. To the payment of the actual reasonable expenses of


preserving the property;


3. To the victim of the crime to compensate said victim for any


loss incurred as a result of the act for which such property was


forfeited; and


4. The balance to a revolving fund in the office of the county


treasurer of the county wherein the property was seized, to be


distributed as follows: one-third (1/3) to the investigating law


enforcement agency; one-third (1/3) of said fund to be used and


maintained as a revolving fund by the district attorney to be used


to defray any lawful expenses of the office of the district


attorney; and one-third (1/3) to go to the jail maintenance fund,


with a yearly accounting to the board of county commissioners in


whose county the fund is established. If the petitioner is not the


district attorney, then the one-third (1/3) which would have been

Req. No. 1397 Page 10


designated to that office shall be distributed to the petitioner.


Monies distributed to the jail maintenance fund shall be used to pay


costs for the storage of such property if such property is ordered


released to a bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee,


or vendor and if such funds are available in said fund.


Q. If the court finds that the property was not used in the


attempt or commission of an act specified in subsection A of this


section and was not property subject to forfeiture pursuant to


subsection B of this section and is not property bearing a


counterfeit mark, the court shall order the property released to the


owner as the right, title, or interest appears on record in the Tax


Commission as of the seizure.


R. No vehicle, airplane, or vessel used by a person as a common


carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier shall be


forfeited pursuant to the provisions of this section unless it shall


be proven that the owner or other person in charge of such


conveyance was a consenting party or privy to the attempt or


commission of an act specified in subsection A or B of this section.


No property shall be forfeited pursuant to the provisions of this


section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner


thereof to have been committed or omitted without the knowledge or


consent of such owner, and by any person other than such owner while


such property was unlawfully in the possession of a person other



Req. No. 1397 Page 11


than the owner in violation of the criminal laws of the United


States or of any state.


S. Whenever any property is forfeited pursuant to this section,


the district court having jurisdiction of the proceeding may order


that the forfeited property may be retained for its official use by


the state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency which seized


the property.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-506, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-506. A. Any peace officer of this state shall seize


the following property:


1. Any property described in subsection A of Section 2-503 of


this title. Such property shall be held as evidence until a


forfeiture has been declared or release ordered, except for property


described in paragraphs 1, 2 and 3 of subsection A of Section 2-503


of this title, or in the case of money, coins, and currency,


deposited as provided in subsection E of Section 2-503 of this


title; provided, any money, coins and currency taken or detained


pursuant to this section may be deposited in an interest-bearing


account by or at the direction of the district attorney in the


office of the county treasurer if the district attorney determines


the currency is not to be held as evidence. All interest earned on


such monies shall be returned to the claimant or forfeited with the



Req. No. 1397 Page 12


money, coins and currency which was taken or detained as provided by


law;


2. Any property described in subsection B of Section 2-503 of


this title; or


3. Any property described in subsection C of Section 2-503 of


this title.


B. Forfeiture actions under this section may only be brought


following the conviction of a person for an offense to which


forfeiture applies. Notice of seizure and intended forfeiture


proceeding shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district


court for the county wherein such property is seized and shall be


given all owners and parties in interest. Notwithstanding any other


provision of law, no filing fees shall be assessed by the court


clerk for the filing of any forfeiture action.


C. Notice shall be given by the agency seeking forfeiture


according to one of the following methods:


1. Upon each owner or party in interest whose right, title or


interest is of record in the Tax Commission, by mailing a copy of


the notice by certified mail to the address as given upon the


records of the Tax Commission;


2. Upon each owner or party in interest whose name and address


is known to the attorney in the office of the agency prosecuting the


action to recover unpaid fines, by mailing a copy of the notice by


registered mail to the last-known address; or

Req. No. 1397 Page 13


3. Upon all other owners or interested parties, whose addresses


are unknown, but who are believed to have an interest in the


property, by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation


in the county where the seizure was made.


D. Within forty-five (45) days after the mailing or publication


of the notice, the owner of the property and any other party in


interest or claimant may file a verified answer and claim to the


property described in the notice of seizure and of the intended


forfeiture proceeding.


E. If at the end of forty-five (45) days after the notice has


been mailed or published there is no verified answer on file, the


court shall hear evidence upon the fact of the unlawful use and


shall order the property forfeited to the state, if such fact is


proved. Except as otherwise provided for in Section 2-503 of this


title, any such property shall be forfeited to the state and sold


under judgment of the court pursuant to the provisions of Section 2-


508 of this title.


F. If a verified answer is filed, the forfeiture proceeding


shall be set for hearing.


G. At a hearing in a proceeding against property described in


paragraphs 3 through 9 of subsection A or subsections B and C of


Section 2-503 of this title, the requirements set forth in said


paragraph or subsection, respectively, shall be satisfied by the


state by a preponderance of the evidence.

Req. No. 1397 Page 14


H. The claimant of any right, title, or interest in the


property may prove a lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract


to be a bona fide or innocent ownership interest and that such


right, title, or interest was created without any knowledge or


reason to believe that the property was being, or was to be, used


for the purpose charged.


I. In the event of such proof, the court shall order the


property released to the bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder,


mortgagee or vendor if the amount due him is equal to, or in excess


of, the value of the property as of the date of the seizure, it


being the intention of this section to forfeit only the right, title


or interest of the purchaser.


J. If the amount due to such person is less than the value of


the property, or if no bona fide claim is established, the property


shall be forfeited to the state and sold under judgment of the


court, as provided for in Section 2-508 of this title, except as


otherwise provided for in Section 2-503 of this title.


K. Property taken or detained under this section shall not be


repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the office


of the district attorney of the county wherein the property was


seized, subject only to the orders and decrees of the court or the


official having jurisdiction thereof; said official shall maintain a


true and accurate inventory and record of all such property seized


under the provisions of this section. The provisions of this

Req. No. 1397 Page 15


subsection shall not apply to property taken or detained by the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, the


Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission,


the Department of Corrections or the Office of the Attorney General.


Property taken or detained by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics


and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws


Enforcement Commission, the Department of Corrections or the Office


of the Attorney General shall be subject to the provisions of


subsections E and F of Section 2-503 of this title.


L. The proceeds of the sale of any property not taken or


detained by the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous


Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement


Commission, the Department of Corrections or the Office of the


Attorney General shall be distributed as follows, in the order


indicated:


1. To the bona fide or innocent purchaser, conditional sales


vendor or mortgagee of the property, if any, up to the amount of his


or her interest in the property, when the court declaring the


forfeiture orders a distribution to such person;


2. To the payment of the actual expenses of preserving the


property and legitimate costs related to the civil forfeiture

Req. No. 1397 Page 16


proceedings. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “legitimate


costs” shall not include court costs associated with any civil


forfeiture proceeding; and


3. The balance to a revolving fund in the office of the county


treasurer of the county wherein the property was seized, said fund


to be used as a revolving fund solely for enforcement of controlled


dangerous substances laws, drug abuse prevention and drug abuse


education, and maintained by the district attorney in his or her


discretion for those purposes with a yearly accounting to the board


of county commissioners in whose county the fund is established and


to the District Attorneys Council; provided, one hundred percent


(100%) of the balance of the proceeds of such sale of property


forfeited due to nonpayment of a fine imposed pursuant to the


provisions of Section 2-415 of this title shall be apportioned as


provided in Section 2-416 of this title. The revolving fund shall


be audited by the State Auditor and Inspector at least every two (2)


years in the manner provided in Section 171 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. Said audit shall include, but not be limited to,


a compliance audit. A district attorney may enter into agreements


with municipal, tribal, county or state agencies to return to such


an agency a percentage of proceeds of the sale of any property


seized by the agency and forfeited under the provisions of this


section. The District Attorneys Council shall adopt guidelines


which ensure that such agencies receive a reasonable percentage of

Req. No. 1397 Page 17


such proceeds, considering the relative contribution of each agency


to the drug enforcement and prosecution operations relating to the


seizure. In formulating said guidelines, the District Attorneys


Council shall examine federal guidelines on asset distribution and


use said guidelines as a basis for establishing guidelines for this


state. The Attorney General is hereby authorized to mediate


disputes between district attorneys and such agencies concerning the


application of said guidelines in particular instances. Any agency


that receives proceeds from an asset distribution shall maintain a


true and accurate record of all such assets.


M. Whenever any vehicle, airplane or vessel is forfeited under


the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, the district court


of jurisdiction may order that the vehicle, airplane or vessel


seized may be retained by the state, county or city law enforcement


agency which seized the vehicle, airplane or vessel for its official


use.


N. If the court finds that the state failed to satisfy the


required showing provided for in subsection G of this section, the


court shall order the property released to the owner or owners.


O. Except as provided for in subsection Q of this section, a


bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee or vendor that


recovers property pursuant to this section shall not be liable for


storage fees.



Req. No. 1397 Page 18


P. Except as provided for in subsection Q of this section,


storage fees shall be paid by the agency which is processing the


seizure and forfeiture from funds generated by seizure and


forfeiture actions.


Q. The bona fide or innocent owner, lien holder, mortgagee or


vendor shall reclaim subject seized property within thirty (30) days


of written notice from the seizing agency. If such person fails to


reclaim the property within the thirty-day time period, then storage


fees may be assessed against their secured interest.


R. 1. At any hearing held relevant to this section, a report


of the findings of the laboratory of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation, the medical examiner’s report of investigation or


autopsy report, or a laboratory report from a forensic laboratory


operated by the State of Oklahoma or any political subdivision


thereof, which has been made available to the accused by the office


of the district attorney or other party to the forfeiture at least


five (5) days prior to the hearing, with reference to all or part of


the evidence submitted, when certified as correct by the persons


making the report shall be received as evidence of the facts and


findings stated, if relevant and otherwise admissible in evidence.


If such report is deemed relevant by the forfeiture applicant or the


respondent, the court shall admit such report without the testimony


of the person making the report, unless the court, pursuant to this


subsection, orders such person to appear.

Req. No. 1397 Page 19


2. When any alleged controlled dangerous substance has been


submitted to the laboratory of the OSBI for analysis, and such


analysis shows that the submitted material is a controlled dangerous


substance, the distribution of which constitutes a felony under the


laws of this state, no portion of such substance shall be released


to any other person or laboratory except to the criminal justice


agency originally submitting the substance to the OSBI for analysis,


absent an order of a district court. The defendant shall


additionally be required to submit to the court a procedure for


transfer and analysis of the subject material to ensure the


integrity of the sample and to prevent the material from being used


in any illegal manner.


3. The court, upon motion of either party, shall order the


attendance of any person preparing a report submitted as evidence in


the hearing when it appears there is a substantial likelihood that


material evidence not contained in said report may be produced by


the testimony of any person having prepared a report. The hearing


shall be held and, if sustained, an order issued not less than five


(5) days prior to the time when the testimony shall be required.


4. If within five (5) days prior to the hearing or during a


hearing, a motion is made pursuant to this section requiring a


person having prepared a report to testify, the court may hear a


report or other evidence but shall continue the hearing until such


time notice of the motion and hearing is given to the person making

Req. No. 1397 Page 20


the report, the motion is heard, and, if sustained, the testimony


ordered can be given.


S. In any forfeiture proceeding under this chapter in which the


defendant or claimant prevails, the court may order the plaintiff


processing the seizure and forfeiture to pay from funds generated by


seizure and forfeiture actions:


1. Reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs


reasonably incurred by the defendant or claimant directly related to


the claim on which the defendant or claimant prevailed;


2. Postjudgment interest; and


3. In cases involving currency or other negotiable instruments:


a. interest actually paid to the state from the date of


seizure or arrest of the property that resulted from


the investment of the property in an interest-bearing


account or instrument, and


b. an imputed amount of interest that such currency,


instruments, or proceeds would have earned at the rate


applicable to the thirty-day Treasury Bill, for any


period during which no interest was paid, not


including any period when the property reasonably was


in use as evidence in an official proceeding or in


conducting scientific tests for the purpose of


collecting evidence, commencing fifteen (15) days


after the property was seized by a law enforcement

Req. No. 1397 Page 21


agency or was turned over to a law enforcement agency


by a federal law enforcement authority.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1397 TEK 1/19/2025 5:41:08 AM







































Req. No. 1397 Page 22